Utah statutes.
19-5-104.5.   Legislative approval.

(1)  Before sending a board-approved report, strategy, or recommendation that will recommend a total maximum daily load end point and implementation strategy to the EPA for review and approval, the Water Quality Board shall submit the report, strategy, or recommendation:

(a)  for review to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee if the report, strategy, or recommendation will require a public or private expenditure in excess of $10,000,000 but less than $100,000,000 for compliance; or

(b)  for approval to the Legislature if the strategy will require a public or private expenditure of $100,000,000 or more.

(2)  In reviewing a report, strategy, or recommendation, the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee may:

(a)  suggest additional areas of consideration; or

(b)  recommend the report, strategy, or recommendation be re-evaluated by the Water Quality Board.

